Arkansas, session 2025, SB87.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-17-203(a), concerning members of a
county planning board, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) With the approval of the majority of the members of the county
quorum court, the county judge of any county may create a county planning
board.
(2) The Except as provided in subdivision (a)(4) of this
section, the county planning board shall consist of not less than five (5)
members nor more than twelve (12) members appointed by the judge and
confirmed by the court.
(3) At least one-third (⅓) of the members shall not hold any
other elective office or appointment, except membership on a municipal or
*SSS041*
02-19-2025 13:57:29 SSS041

As Engrossed: S2/10/25 S2/19/25 SB87
joint planning commission or a zoning board of adjustment.
(4) A county with a population of two hundred thousand (200,000)
or more according to the most recent federal decennial census that contains
eight (8) municipalities or less shall select members of the county planning
board in the following manner:
(A) Members shall be appointed by the county judge and
confirmed by a majority of the members of the county quorum court
representing any part of an unincorporated area of the county; and
(B) At least two-thirds (2/3) of the voting members of the
county planning board shall reside in an unincorporated area of the county.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 14-17-207(f), concerning enforcement of
official plans and implementing ordinances, is amended to read as follows:
(f)(1)(A) The quorum court shall provide for the means of enforcing
the official plan or zoning, subdivision, setback, and entry control
ordinances, shall provide penalties for violations, and may seek appropriate
remedies for violations.
(B) A person who knowingly violates a subdivision
ordinance requiring plat approval by the county planning board before a
parcel of land can be sold is subject to a civil penalty of:
(i) Five hundred dollars ($500) for a first
violation;
(ii) One thousand dollars ($1,000) for a second
violation;
(iii) One thousand five hundred ($1,500) for a third
violation; and
(iv) Two thousand dollars ($2,000) for a fourth
violation or subsequent violation.
(2) Any individual aggrieved by a violation of any such plan or
ordinance may request an injunction against any individual or property owner
in violation or may mandamus any official to enforce the provisions of the
ordinance.

/s/M. Johnson


02-19-2025 13:57:29 SSS041